Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.010

Definitions.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Bond" means any revenue bond or general obligation bond.

(2) "General obligation bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation of a public body which constitutes an indebtedness within the meaning of the constitutional debt limitation.

(3) "Governing body" means the council, commission, board of commissioners, board of directors, board of trustees, board of regents, or other legislative body of the public body designated herein in which the legislative powers of the public body are vested. With respect to the state, "governing body" means the state finance committee.

(4) "Government obligations" means any of the following: (a) Direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America and bank certificates of deposit secured by such obligations; (b) bonds, debentures, notes, participation certificates, or other obligations issued by the banks for cooperatives, the federal intermediate credit bank, the federal home loan bank system, the export-import bank of the United States, federal land banks, or the federal national mortgage association; (c) public housing bonds and project notes fully secured by contracts with the United States; and (d) obligations of financial institutions insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, to the extent insured or to the extent guaranteed as permitted under any other provision of state law.

(5) "Issuer" means the public body issuing any bond or bonds.

(6) "Ordinance" means an ordinance of a city or town, or ordinance, resolution or other instrument by which the governing body of the public body exercising any power under this chapter takes formal action and adopts legislative provisions and matters of some permanency.

(7) "Public body" means the state of Washington, its agencies, institutions, political subdivisions, and municipal and quasi-municipal corporations now or hereafter existing under the laws of the state of Washington.

(8) "Refunding bonds" means bonds issued for the purpose of paying the principal of or redemption premiums or interest on any outstanding bonds of the issuer, its predecessor, or a related public body.

(9) "Refunding plan" means the plan adopted by an ordinance of a public body to issue refunding bonds and redeem the bonds to be refunded.

(10) "Revenue bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation for the payment of money that is payable from designated revenues, special assessments, or a special fund but excluding any obligation constituting an indebtedness within the meaning of the constitutional debt limitation.

[ 1999 c 230 s 1; 1984 c 186 s 68; 1973 1st ex.s. c 25 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 138 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—Construction—1999 c 230: "The authority of a public body to issue refunding bonds pursuant to this act is additional to any existing authority to issue such bonds and nothing in this act shall prevent the issuance of such bonds pursuant to any other law, and this act shall not be construed to amend any existing law authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds by a public body." [ 1999 c 230 s 13.]

Severability—1999 c 230: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1999 c 230 s 14.]

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.